Massachusetts, session 194th, H2080.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. To ensure the creation of opportunity by investing in the infrastructure
needed to provide job training, and workforce development for workers with limited-English
proficiency (LEP), an ESOL for economic mobility coordinator position shall be created within
the Executive Office of Labor and Workforce Development established under Chapter 23,
section 1 of the General Laws to develop a statewide, comprehensive, actionable strategy to
prepare newly-arrived and other LEP workers with the English language skills needed to fill in-
demand jobs across Massachusetts. In developing an ESOL for economic mobility strategy, the
coordinator must convene stakeholders, including but not limited to employers, job training
providers, worker advocacy organizations, community-based organizations, and constituents, to
incorporate their feedback and recommendations for strategies to achieve the objectives herein.
The coordinator shall manage all efforts through the Workforce Skills Cabinet established in
Massachusetts Executive Order No. 560 to ensure the following ESOL for economic mobility
objectives are met in concert with the Executive Office of Education and Department of
of 4

Elementary and Secondary Education; accomplished in addition to and not the detriment of
ESOL efforts in those agencies; and achieved in collaboration with the Executive Office of
Economic Development in measuring the effectiveness of ESOL for economic mobility in
meeting employers needs. The coordinator shall be responsible for, but is not limited to, the
implementation of the following objectives:
a.) Develop a statewide ESOL expansion strategy, in collaboration with the executive
office of education, with a focus on providing ESOL for economic mobility to new arrivals and
the LEP population.
b.) Increase investment in ESOL to bring capacity into alignment with the state’s growing
LEP population.
c.) As resource levels rise, shift state ESOL for workforce funding to vocational
programs.
d.) Leverage community colleges to bring more federal resources into the ESOL delivery
system.
e.) Support regional collaboration and remove barriers to coordination among local
service providers.
f.) Build the ESOL educator workforce.
g.) Improve data collection and support research and evaluation.
SECTION 2. PILOT
of 4

Within 90 days of passage of this act, there shall be an ESOL for economic mobility pilot
program administered by ESOL for economic mobility coordinator in the Executive Office of
Labor and Workforce Development’s to expediently expand the availability of ESOL for
economic mobility to meet the immediate demands of employers and provide opportunities for
employment to newly-arrived, long-time unemployed, and underemployed workers with limited-
English proficiency
SECTION 3. REPORTING
Not later than one year after passage of this act, the office shall submit its comprehensive
strategic plan and report on measurable outcomes achieved to meet its statutory duties, along
with suggested specific objectives, key performance indicators and outcome measures proposed
for the following year. The report shall include data and statistics on the total number of students
served, percent increase in investment to ESOL programs, number of community college
programs and students served by them, number of vocational ESOL programs and students
served by them, and number of new ESOL educators deployed through these programs and
numbers of jobs gained by individuals who have successfully completed ESOL programs.
Thereafter, the office shall annually submit the report by August 30 to the governor, the secretary
of labor and workforce development, the chairs and ranking minority members of the joint
committee on labor and workforce development, and the joint committee on Education and the
clerks of the House and Senate.
SECTION 4. FUNDING COORDINATOR AND PROGRAMS
The sums set forth in this act, for the purposes and subject to the conditions specified in
this act, are hereby made available, subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public
of 4

funds, which sums shall be in addition to any other amounts previously appropriated for these
purposes…………$13,000,000
of 4